Project2/verbs-lex.txt
Multichar_Symbols +Verb +Imp +Past +Pres +Cond +Inf +Fut +Ger +Sg +Pl +Pers1 +Pers2 +Pers3

LEXICON Root
Verbs ;

LEXICON Verbs
kąp AllVerbs ;
drzem AllVerbs ;

LEXICON AllVerbs
VerbConj ;
Past ;
Cond ;
Imp ;
Ger ;

LEXICON VerbConj
ać+Verb+Inf:ać # ;               ! bezokolicznik
ać+Verb+Pres+Sg+Pers1:ię # ;     ! ja kąpię
ać+Verb+Pres+Sg+Pers2:iesz # ;   ! ty kąpiesz
ać+Verb+Pres+Sg+Pers3:ie # ;     ! on/ona kąpie
ać+Verb+Pres+Pl+Pers1:iemy # ;   ! my kąpiemy
ać+Verb+Pres+Pl+Pers2:iecie # ;  ! wy kąpiecie
ać+Verb+Pres+Pl+Pers3:ią # ;     ! oni/one kąpią

LEXICON Past
ać+Verb+Past+Sg+Pers1:ałem # ;       ! ja kąpałem
ać+Verb+Past+Sg+Pers1:ałam # ;       ! ja kąpałam
ać+Verb+Past+Sg+Pers1:ałom # ;       ! ja kąpałom
ać+Verb+Past+Sg+Pers2:ałeś # ;       ! ty kąpałeś
ać+Verb+Past+Sg+Pers2:ałaś # ;       ! ty kąpałaś
ać+Verb+Past+Sg+Pers2:ałoś # ;       ! ty kąpałoś
ać+Verb+Past+Sg+Pers3:ał # ;         ! on kąpał
ać+Verb+Past+Sg+Pers3:ała # ;        ! ona kąpała
ać+Verb+Past+Sg+Pers3:ało # ;        ! ono kąpało
ać+Verb+Past+Pl+Pers1:aliśmy # ;     ! my kąpaliśmy
ać+Verb+Past+Pl+Pers1:ałiśmy # ;     ! my kąpałiśmy
ać+Verb+Past+Pl+Pers2:aliście # ;    ! wy kąpaliście
ać+Verb+Past+Pl+Pers2:ałiście # ;    ! wy kąpałiście
ać+Verb+Past+Pl+Pers3:ali # ;        ! oni kąpali
ać+Verb+Past+Pl+Pers3:ały # ;        ! one kąpały

LEXICON Cond
ać+Verb+Cond+Sg+Pers1:ałbym # ;       ! ja kąpałbym
ać+Verb+Cond+Sg+Pers1:ałabym # ;      ! ja kąpałabym
ać+Verb+Cond+Sg+Pers1:ałobym # ;      ! ja kąpałobym
ać+Verb+Cond+Sg+Pers2:ałbyś # ;       ! ty kąpałbyś
ać+Verb+Cond+Sg+Pers2:ałabyś # ;      ! ty kąpałabyś
ać+Verb+Cond+Sg+Pers2:ałobyś # ;      ! ty kąpałobyś
ać+Verb+Cond+Sg+Pers3:ałby # ;        ! on kąpałby
ać+Verb+Cond+Sg+Pers3:ałaby # ;       ! ona kąpałaby
ać+Verb+Cond+Sg+Pers3:ałoby # ;       ! ono kąpałoby
ać+Verb+Cond+Pl+Pers1:alibyśmy # ;    ! my kąpalibyśmy
ać+Verb+Cond+Pl+Pers1:ałybyśmy # ;    ! my kąpałybyśmy
ać+Verb+Cond+Pl+Pers2:alibyście # ;   ! wy kąpalibyście
ać+Verb+Cond+Pl+Pers2:ałybyście # ;   ! wy kąpałybyście
ać+Verb+Cond+Pl+Pers3:aliby # ;       ! oni kąpaliby
ać+Verb+Cond+Pl+Pers3:ałyby # ;       ! one kąpałyby

LEXICON Imp
+Verb+Imp+Sg+Pers2:0 # ;    ! kąp
+Verb+Imp+Pl+Pers1:my # ;   ! kąpmy
+Verb+Imp+Pl+Pers2:cie # ;  ! kąpcie

LEXICON Ger
ać+Verb+Ger:anie # ;        ! kąpanie
ać+Verb+Ger:iąc # ;         ! kąpiąc
ać+Verb+Ger:awszy # ;       ! kąpawszy
ać+Verb+Ger:ano # ;        ! kąpano
